Louisiana, session 2026, SB79.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Pursuant to R.S. 49:193, Louisiana Economic Development and the
statutory entities made a part of the department by law shall be re-created effective June 30,
2026, and all statutory authority therefor is continued in accordance with the provisions of
Part XII of Chapter 1 of Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
Section 2. All statutory authority for the existence of Louisiana Economic
Development and the statutory entities made a part of the department as re-created by
Section 1 of this Act shall cease as of July 1, 2031, pursuant to R.S. 49:191. However,
Louisiana Economic Development may be re-created prior to such date in accordance with
the provisions of Part XII of Chapter 1 of Title 49 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950.
Section 3. The provisions of R.S. 49:193 are hereby superseded to the extent that
those provisions are in conflict with the provisions of this Act.
Section 4. R.S. 49:191(3)(b) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§191. Termination of legislative authority for existence of statutory entities; phase-
out period for statutory entities; table of dates
Notwithstanding any termination dates set by any previous Act of the
legislature, the statutory entities set forth in this Section shall begin to terminate their
operations on July first of each of the following years, and all legislative authority
for the existence of any statutory entity, as defined in R.S. 49:190, shall cease as of
July first of the following year, which shall be the termination date:
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 79 ENROLLED
* * *
(3) July 1, 2030:
* * *
(b) Louisiana Economic Development and all statutory entities made a
part of the department by law.
* * *
Section 5. R.S. 49:191(1)(a) is repealed in its entirety.
Section 6. This Act shall become effective on June 30, 2026; if vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on
the day following such approval by the legislature or June 30, 2026, whichever is later.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.